District of Columbia statutes.
42-3301

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

The term “apartment house” means any building or part thereof, not used primarily for transient occupancy, in which there are 3 or more apartments, each with 1 or more habitable rooms with kitchen and bathroom facilities exclusively for use of and under the control of the occupant thereof.

(2)

The term “tenant” means any person who holds or possesses a habitation in subordination to the title of the owner of the premises in which such habitation is located, with the consent of the owner.

History

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-94, § 2, 27 DCR 3500

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-541.